Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2708
APHIS representative, defined.

APHIS representative means an individual employed by APHIS in animal health activities who is authorized by the administrator to perform the functions and duties involved in the scrapie control and eradication program.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 8.